Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 23. Pedestrians’ Rights and Duties.

§ 63-3-1101.
Pedestrians subject to traffic-control signals at intersections; privileges and restrictions at other locations.

Pedestrians shall be subject to traffic control signals at intersections as heretofore declared in this chapter. At all other places pedestrians shall be accorded the privileges and shall be subject to the restrictions stated in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8200; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1103.
Pedestrians’ right-of-way at crosswalks lacking traffic control signals; duty of vehicle approaching vehicle stopped for pedestrian.

Where traffic control signals are not in place or in operation the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within any marked crosswalk or within any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass such stopped vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8201; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1105.
Pedestrians crossing roadways at locations other than crosswalks.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic control signals are in operation pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8202; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-3-1107.
Pedestrians to use right half of crosswalks.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8203; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1109.
Solicitation of rides by pedestrians.

No person shall stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride from the driver of any private vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8204; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1111.
Rights of blind and otherwise incapacitated pedestrians crossing at or near intersections or crosswalks; effect of failure to employ cane or guide dog; regulation of use of canes.

Whenever a pedestrian is crossing or attempting to cross a public street or highway, at or near an intersection or crosswalk, guided by a guide dog or carrying in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick which is metallic or white in color, or white tipped with red, the driver of every vehicle approaching in said intersection or crosswalk shall take such precautions as may be necessary to avoid injuring or endangering such pedestrian, and if injury or danger to such pedestrian can be avoided only by bringing his vehicle to a full stop, he shall bring his said vehicle to a full stop. The word “vehicle,” when used in this section, does not include a train operated on railroad tracks.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to deprive any totally or partially blind or otherwise incapacitated person, not carrying such a cane or walking stick or not being guided by a dog, of the rights and privileges conferred by law upon pedestrians crossing streets or highways. The failure of such totally or partially blind or otherwise incapacitated person to carry a cane or walking stick or to be guided by a guide dog upon the streets, highways or sidewalks of this state, shall not be held to constitute or be evidence of contributory negligence.

It shall be unlawful for any person, unless totally or partially blind or otherwise incapacitated, while on any public street or highway, to carry in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick which is metallic or white in color, or white tipped with red.

The violation of any provision of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ten (10) days.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8203.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 330, §§ 1-4; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 341, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-3-1112.
Duty of driver to avoid collision with pedestrian or person propelling human-powered vehicle; warning signal.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian or any person propelling a human-powered vehicle and shall give an audible signal when necessary and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused, incapacitated or intoxicated person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-3-1113.
Driving through safety zone.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8208; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.